California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, moneys from mining activities on federal lands disbursed by the United States each fiscal year to this state pursuant to Section 35 of the Mineral Lands Leasing Act, as amended (30 U.S.C. Sec. 191) shall be deposited in the Surface Mining and Reclamation Account in the General Fund, which account is hereby created, in an amount equal to the appropriation for this chapter contained in the annual Budget Act for that fiscal year, plus any statewide general administrative costs assessed to the account for that fiscal year, and may be expended, upon that appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Proposed expenditures from the account shall be included in a separate item in the Budget Act for each fiscal year
 for consideration by the Legislature. Each appropriation from the account shall be subject to all of the limitations contained in the Budget Act and to all other fiscal procedures prescribed by law with respect to the expenditure of state funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 31, Sec. 19.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2796.5.

(a) The supervisor, with the consultation of appropriate state and local agencies, may remediate or complete reclamation of abandoned mined lands that meet all of the following requirements:

(1) No operator having both the responsibility and the financial ability to remediate or reclaim the mined lands can be found within the state.

(2) No reclamation plan is in effect for the mined lands.

(3) No financial assurances exist for the mined lands.

(4) The mined lands
 are abandoned, as that term is used in paragraph (6) of subdivision (h) of Section 2770.

(b) In deciding whether to act pursuant to subdivision (a), the supervisor shall consider whether the action would accomplish one of the following:

(1) The protection of the public health and safety or the environment from the adverse effects of past surface mining operations.

(2) The protection of property that is in danger as a result of past surface mining operations.

(3) The restoration of land and water resources previously degraded by the adverse effects of surface mining operations.

(c) The supervisor
 may also consider the potential liability to the state in deciding whether to act under this section. Neither the supervisor, the department, nor the state, or its appointees, employees, or agents, in conducting remediation or reclamation under this section, shall be liable under applicable state law, and it is the intent of the Legislature that those persons and entities not be liable for those actions under federal laws.

(d) (1) The remediation or reclamation work performed under this section includes, but is not limited to, supervision of remediation or reclamation activities that, in the supervisor’s judgment, is required by the magnitude of the endeavor or the urgency for prompt action needed to protect the public health and safety or the environment. The action may be taken in default of, or in addition to,
 remedial work by any other person or governmental agency, and regardless of whether injunctive relief is being sought.

(2) The supervisor may authorize the work to be performed through department staff, with the cooperation of any other governmental agency, or through contracts, and may use rented tools or equipment, either with or without operators furnished.

(3) In cases of emergency where quick action is necessary, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the supervisor may enter into oral contracts for the work, and the contracts, whether
 written or oral, may include provisions for the rental of tools or equipment and in addition the furnishing of labor and materials necessary to accomplish the work. These emergency contracts are exempt from approval by the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code.

(4) The supervisor shall be permitted reasonable access to the abandoned mined lands as necessary to perform any remediation or reclamation work. The access shall be obtained with the consent of the owner or possessor of the property or, if the consent is withheld or otherwise unobtainable, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to the procedure described in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. However, in the event of an emergency affecting the public health or safety, the
 supervisor may enter the property without consent or the issuance of a warrant.

(e) For any remediation or reclamation work accomplished, or other necessary remedial action taken by any governmental agency, the operator, landowner, and the person or persons who allowed or caused any pollution or nuisance are liable to that governmental agency to the extent of the reasonable costs actually incurred in remediating, reclaiming, or taking other remedial action. The amount of the costs is recoverable in a civil action by, and paid to, the governmental agency and the supervisor to the extent of the supervisor’s contribution to the costs of the remediation, reclamation, cleanup, and abatement or other corrective action.

(f) (1) The amount of the costs constitutes a lien
 on the affected property upon service of a copy of the notice of lien on the owner and upon the recordation of a notice of lien, which identifies the property on which the remediation or reclamation was accomplished, the amount of the lien, and the owner of record of the property, in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property is located. Upon recordation, the lien has the same force, effect, and priority as a judgment lien, except that it attaches only to the property posted and described in the lien. The lien shall continue for 10 years from the time of the recording of the notice of the lien unless sooner released or otherwise discharged, and may be renewed.

(2) Not later than 45 days after receiving a notice of lien, the owner may petition the court for an order releasing the property from the lien or
 reducing the amount of the lien. In this court action, the governmental agency that incurred the costs shall establish that the costs were reasonable and necessary. The lien may be foreclosed by an action brought by the supervisor, for a money judgment. Money recovered by a judgment in favor of the supervisor shall be used for the purposes of this chapter.

(g) If the operation has been idle for more than one year without obtaining an approved interim management plan, an application for the review of an interim management plan filed for the purpose of preventing the supervisor from undertaking remediation or reclamation of abandoned mined lands under this section shall be voidable by the lead agency or the board upon notice and hearing by the lead agency or the board. In the event of conflicting determinations, the decision of the board shall
 prevail.

(h) “Remediate,” for the purposes of this section, means to improve conditions so that threat to or damage to public health and safety or the environment are lessened or ameliorated, including the cleanup and abatement of pollution or nuisance or threatened pollution or nuisance.

(i) “Threaten,” for the purposes of this section, means a condition creating a probability of harm, when the probability and potential extent of harm make it reasonably necessary to take action to prevent, reduce, or mitigate damages to persons, property, or the environment.

(j) This section shall apply to abandoned mined lands on which the mining operations were conducted after January 1, 1976.

(k) The supervisor may act under this section only upon the appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes of carrying out this section.

(l) Nothing in this section limits the authority of any state agency under any other law or regulation to enforce or administer any cleanup or abatement activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 49.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Earthquakes [2800. - 2804.]

2800.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The state’s major metropolitan areas are subject to potentially devastating large magnitude earthquakes and earth scientists estimate that there is a high probability that one or more large earthquakes will occur in California between now and the end of the century.

(b) Loss of life and property damage resulting from a damaging earthquake could be substantially reduced if there existed a reliable short-term earthquake prediction system capable of providing public warning of the size and location of a damaging earthquake within a timeframe of a few weeks to a few hours.

(c) While earth scientists are not in full agreement about the feasibility of short-term earthquake prediction, there is increasing interest in the possibility that precursory geochemical and geophysical phenomena can be identified within short timeframes and that these precursory events can become the basis for timely and reliable warnings of damaging earthquakes.

(d) California currently has a unique opportunity to assess the feasibility of short-term earthquake prediction by joining the United States Geological Survey in a study of the Parkfield section of the San Andreas fault in Monterey County. This section has, between 1857 and 1966, produced almost identical earthquakes of about 5.6 magnitude on the average of every 22 years. Another earthquake probably will occur in January of 1988, plus or minus four years. If adequate instrumentation is in place by the time the earthquake occurs, it may be possible to identify specific precursory phenomena. However, at present, the instrumentation is not considered adequate to fully monitor precursory events and, because of anticipated federal budget cuts, additional instrumentation is unlikely to be installed unless the state is able to participate in the Parkfield study. State participation would also allow the United States Geological Survey to share its data from Parkfield and permit the state to independently analyze and evaluate this data specifically for earthquake prediction and response purposes.

(e) If precursory earthquake phenomena are identified as a result of the Parkfield study, there is a need to assess the feasibility of establishing a statewide earthquake prediction system and to develop a short-term response plan which, among other things, would include development of procedures for verifying the predicted event and guidelines for taking state action in response to anomalous precursory phenomena.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1198, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

2801.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Long-term prediction” means a prediction of an earthquake that is expected to occur within a few years up to a few decades.

(b) “Intermediate-term prediction” means a prediction of an earthquake that is expected to occur within a period of a few weeks to a few years.

(c) “Short-term prediction” means a prediction of an earthquake that is expected to occur within a few hours to a few weeks.

(d) “Parkfield prototype earthquake prediction system” means a dense cluster of instruments along the Parkfield section of the San Andreas fault which monitors earthquake activity, local distortion of the Earth’s crust, strain levels, creep adjustments along the fault, and other phenomena which may be useful in making a short-term earthquake prediction.

(e) “Parkfield characteristic earthquake” means an earthquake that has, among other qualities, a magnitude between 5.5 and 6.0 on the Richter scale, and occurs on a location somewhere along the 15-mile section of the San Andreas fault that is centered in the City of Parkfield.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1198, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

(a) The department shall develop jointly with the United States Geological Survey a prototype earthquake prediction system along the central San Andreas fault near the City of Parkfield.

(b) The system shall include a dense cluster of seismic and crustal deformation instrumentation capable of monitoring geophysical and geochemical phenomena associated with earthquakes in the region. These data shall be analyzed continuously to determine if precursory anomalies can be identified with sufficient certainty to make a short-term prediction. The department shall not duplicate any of the ongoing efforts of the United States Geological Survey or any public or private college or university in
 the development of this system.

(c) In meeting its obligations under this chapter, the department shall develop, in cooperation with the United States Geological Survey, a plan for completion of the Parkfield instrumentation network. The plan shall provide for all of the following:

(1) Augmentation of monitoring instruments with the goal of detecting precursors of the Parkfield characteristic earthquake.

(2) Operation by the department of a remote data review station in Sacramento which will provide state scientists with data from the Parkfield prototype earthquake prediction system and other data, as required, to advise the Office of Emergency Services of the occurrence of precursors and verification of the predicted event.

(3) Advising the United States Geological Survey, the Office of Emergency Services, the Seismic Safety Commission, and the California Earthquake Prediction Evaluation Council, regarding the department’s review of Parkfield data.

(d) On January 1, 1987, the department shall issue a progress report to the Governor, the Legislature, and the Seismic Safety Commission. An annual progress report shall be made each year thereafter. The project shall terminate on January 1, 1992, unless extended by statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 474.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.

(a) Concurrently with the development of the Parkfield prototype earthquake prediction system, the Office of Emergency Services, in consultation with the California Earthquake Prediction Evaluation Council, shall develop a comprehensive emergency response plan for short-term earthquake predictions. The plan shall include all of the following:

(1) A method of peer review involving the California Earthquake Prediction Evaluation Council to evaluate the validity of short-term earthquake predictions and to develop guidelines for initiating state action in response to anomalous geochemical and geophysical phenomena.

(2) A
 means of rapidly activating governmental response to a predicted event.

(3) Plans for mitigating earthquake losses to vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, drawdown of impoundment levels behind dams, positioning of emergency equipment in safe areas, and mobilization of firefighting, law enforcement, rescue, and medical personnel.

(4) A public warning system.

(5) Strategies for dealing with earthquake predictions that fail to occur (false alarms) and the failure of an earthquake prediction system to forecast a damaging event.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall consult with the department, the Seismic Safety Commission, the United
 States Geological Survey, and the Federal Emergency Management Agency in the development of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 475.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2804.

The department and the Seismic Safety Commission may solicit and receive gifts and grants from other public and private agencies for the state’s share of costs under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1198, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Earthquake Education [2805. - 2808.]

2805.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Earthquake Education Act of 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1558, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2806.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) California has recently experienced and will continue to experience in the foreseeable future damaging earthquakes of moderate to great magnitude. Efforts have been needed to increase the awareness of earthquake hazards through education so that future losses of life, injuries, loss of property, and social disruption will be minimized when those events occur.

(b) Because of a lack of any state or local earthquake safety education program, it has been necessary for the state to assume leadership through the policy and guidance of the Seismic Safety Commission to develop and test earthquake safety programs which provide informational material to schools and the general public for minimizing potential disruption and loss of life.

(c) Since the pilot earthquake safety education and preparedness programs developed under the California Earthquake Education Act of 1981 have been tested, their effectiveness analyzed, and they have been deemed successful by the Seismic Safety Commission, the Legislature believes that it is appropriate, as stated by the Earthquake Education Act of 1981, that those programs be distributed and implemented throughout the earthquake-prone areas of the state.

(d) It is necessary that funds be appropriated to the Seismic Safety Commission from the General Fund for the purpose of expanding the earthquake safety program for statewide implementation over the next three years which, when completed, will constitute for the first time in history, a comprehensive, statewide self-supporting earthquake safety education program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1558, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.

(a) There is hereby established a project for the implementation of a statewide program of earthquake safety education and preparedness entitled the California Earthquake Education Project (CALEEP). The Seismic Safety Commission may contract with the University of California to carry out the project. The project shall focus on identifying state and local leadership interested in using the CALEEP materials, disseminating those materials, and utilizing the materials.

(b) The project shall develop a relationship with the State Department of Education, interested teacher’s education computer centers statewide, and interested counties and school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1558, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2808.

The objectives of the project are all of the following:

(a) Developing public awareness regarding the causes of earthquakes, the forces and effects of earthquakes, and the need for school and community action in coping with earthquake hazards.

(b) Promoting understanding of the impact of earthquakes on natural features and man-made structures.

(c) Motivating the public to establish measures prior, during, and after earthquakes to ensure their public safety.

(d) Disseminating, as widely as possible throughout the state, the program and project materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1558, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Earthquake Preparedness [2810. - 2815.]

2810.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Most of the state’s major metropolitan areas are subject to potentially devastating, large magnitude earthquakes.

(b) Earth scientists estimate that there is greater than a 50 percent probability that one or more damaging earthquakes will occur in these metropolitan areas between now and the end of the century.

(c) The commission, in conjunction with other local, state, and federal agencies, has initiated programs to prepare the state for responding to the threat of major earthquakes. The first program, the Southern California Earthquake Preparedness Project, is administered by the office. The commission has since initiated a similar effort in northern California, the Bay Area Regional Earthquake Preparedness Project.

(d) Through the work of the Southern California Earthquake Preparedness Project and the Bay Area Regional Earthquake Preparedness Project, earthquake mitigation and preparedness plans, procedures, and educational materials have been developed and used to encourage and support local jurisdictions’ preparedness activities in both southern and northern California.

(e) Since July 1, 1984, the commission and the office have jointly carried out a comprehensive earthquake preparedness program by providing planning and technical assistance as follows:

(1) To local jurisdictions, volunteer agencies and associations, and private-sector organizations, to develop and implement hazard mitigation and prevention programs to reduce earthquake vulnerability.

(2) To improve regionwide preparedness and response capabilities.

(3) To stimulate and promote innovative preparedness planning activities by local jurisdictions.

(f) The activities of the Southern California Earthquake Preparedness Project and the Bay Area Regional Earthquake Preparedness Project have successfully encouraged and supported local programs that reduce potential earthquake hazards and increase preparedness capabilities of participating jurisdictions and raise the level of citizens’ awareness of, and preparedness for, earthquakes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Agency” or “office” means the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) “Commission” means the Seismic Safety Commission.

(c) “Local jurisdiction” means a city, county, or district.

(d) “Preparedness” means long-term preearthquake hazard mitigation, reconstruction, and recovery planning and preparation for emergency response.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 476.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.

(a) The projects authorized by this chapter shall promote voluntary actions by local jurisdictions, volunteer agencies and associations, and private organizations which address all aspects of seismic safety, including, but not limited to, mitigation, public information and education, response, and recovery planning.

(b) The projects may do all of the following:

(1) Provide planning and technical assistance for developing and implementing earthquake hazard mitigation and loss prevention programs that reduce earthquake vulnerability.

(2) Provide planning and technical assistance to improve regional, local, community, corporate, and public and private school preparedness.

(3) Provide planning and technical assistance to local jurisdictions to improve regional and local agencies’ response capabilities for predicted and unpredicted earthquakes.

(4) Participate with local, regional, state, and federal agencies, councils of government, and private organizations in providing education and training workshops and conferences on comprehensive earthquake preparedness.

(5) Promote innovative approaches by local jurisdictions in the areas of public education and individual, community, and private-sector preparedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2814.

The earthquake preparedness activities established under this chapter shall be carried out by the Office of Emergency Services. The commission and Office of Emergency Services shall work together and use appropriate scientific information and recommendations provided by the survey. Other arrangements to coordinate the activities established by this chapter shall be made, through mutual agreement, by the commission and the Office of Emergency Services. A local advisory board shall be established to provide advice and guidance on project activities in the Counties of San Diego, Imperial, and Santa Barbara.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 50.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.

The Office of Emergency Services may enter into agreements with local, regional, and federal agencies, councils of government, and private organizations and contractors, and may receive and expend funds provided by those entities in support of comprehensive earthquake preparedness programs authorized by this chapter. The commission and Office of Emergency Services shall seek assistance from appropriate federal agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 478.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. OIL AND GAS [3000. - 3865.]



CHAPTER 1. Oil and Gas Conservation [3000. - 3473.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [3000. - 3017.]

3000.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions hereinafter set forth shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1670.)
-------------------------------------------

3001.

“Department,” in reference to the government of this state, means the Department of Conservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

“Division,” in reference to the government of this state, means the Geologic Energy Management Division in the Department of Conservation; otherwise “division” means Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 8.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.

“Director” means the Director of Conservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

“Supervisor” means the State Oil and Gas Supervisor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3005.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, association, corporation, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3006.

“Oil” includes petroleum, and “petroleum” includes oil.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3007.

“Gas” means any natural hydrocarbon gas coming from the earth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------

3008.

(a) “Well” means any oil or gas well or well for the discovery of oil or gas; any well on lands producing or reasonably presumed to contain oil or gas; any well drilled for the purpose of injecting fluids or gas for stimulating oil or gas recovery, repressuring or pressure maintenance of oil or gas reservoirs, or disposing of waste fluids from an oil or gas field; any well used to inject or withdraw gas from an underground storage facility; or any well drilled within or adjacent to an oil or gas pool for the purpose of obtaining water to be used in production stimulation or repressuring operations.

(b) “Prospect well” or “exploratory well” means any well drilled to extend a field or
 explore a new, potentially productive reservoir.

(c) “Active observation well” means a well being used for the sole purpose of gathering reservoir data, such as pressure or temperature in a reservoir being currently produced or injected by the operator. For a well to be an active observation well, the operator shall demonstrate to the division’s satisfaction that the well fulfills a need for gathering reservoir data, and the operator shall provide the division with a summary report of the type of data collected at least annually or as requested by the division.

(d) “Idle well” means any well that for a period of 24 consecutive months has not either produced oil or natural gas, produced water to be used in production stimulation, or been used for enhanced oil recovery, reservoir pressure
 management, or injection. For the purpose of determining whether a well is an idle well, production or injection is subject to verification by the division. An idle well continues to be an idle well until it has been properly abandoned in accordance with Section 3208 or it has been shown to the division’s satisfaction that, since the well became an idle well, the well has for a continuous six-month period either maintained production of oil or natural gas, maintained production of water used in production stimulation, or been used for enhanced oil recovery, reservoir pressure management, or injection. An idle well does not include an active observation well.

(e) “Long-term idle well” means any well that has been an idle well for eight or more years.

(f) “Low-production well”
 means an oil or gas well that produces, on average, fewer than 15 barrels of oil a day during
 the past 12 consecutive months, or a natural gas well whose maximum daily average gas production does not exceed 60,000 cubic feet of gas, per day, during the past 12 consecutive months. A low-production well does not include a natural gas storage well, a dedicated injection well, an active observation well, an idle well as defined in
 subdivision (d),
 or a fully plugged and abandoned well.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 549, Sec. 2.   (AB 2716)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3009.

“Operator” means a person who, by virtue of ownership, or under the authority of a lease or any other agreement, has the right to drill, operate, maintain, or control a well or production facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.

“Production facility” means any equipment attendant to oil and gas production or injection operations including, but not limited to, tanks, flowlines, headers, gathering lines, wellheads, heater treaters, pumps, valves, compressors, injection equipment, and pipelines that are not under the jurisdiction of the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51010 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3011.

(a) The purposes of this division include protecting public health and safety and environmental quality, including reduction and mitigation of greenhouse gas emissions associated with the development of hydrocarbon and geothermal resources in a manner that meets the energy needs of the state.

(b) The supervisor shall coordinate with other state agencies and entities described in subdivision (f) of Section 38501 of the Health and Safety Code in furtherance of the goals of the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code) and to help support the state’s clean energy goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 9.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3012.

The provisions of this division apply to any land or well situated within the boundaries of an incorporated city in which the drilling of oil wells is now or may hereafter be prohibited, until all wells therein have been abandoned as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 898.)
-------------------------------------------

3013.

This division shall be liberally construed to meet its purposes, and the director and the supervisor, acting with the approval of the director, shall have all powers, including the authority to adopt rules and regulations, which may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 999, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3014.

“District” means an oil and gas district as provided for in Section 3100.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3015 by Stats. 1974, Ch. 765.)
-------------------------------------------

3015.

For the purpose of implementing Section 503 of the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978, the supervisor may make the determinations entrusted to state agencies having regulatory jurisdiction with respect to the production of natural gas. Such determinations shall be made pursuant to procedures prescribed in guidelines adopted by the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 725.)
-------------------------------------------

3016.

For purposes of this chapter, abandoned underground personal property, including a well, of an operator shall become the property of the mineral interest owner when the operator loses the right to remove the personal property under common law or under a lease or any other agreement that initially gave the operator the right to drill, operate, maintain, or control the well. In that case, in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 3237, the mineral interest owner shall be held jointly liable for the well if, in the lease or other conveyance, the mineral interest owner retained a right to control the well operations that exceeds the scope of an interest customarily reserved in a lease or other conveyance in the event of
 default.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 272, Sec. 2.   (AB 2729)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3017.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the oil and gas industry pay for all necessary costs of plugging and abandonment and site restoration of oil and gas wells.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that, to minimize the risk that the state will be liable for costs of plugging and abandonment, no well be transferred to another owner until and unless a bond has been filed that would cover the full cost of plugging and abandonment and site restoration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 359, Sec. 2.   (AB 1167)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [3100. - 3115.]

3100.

For the purposes of this chapter, the state is divided into districts, the number and boundaries of which shall be fixed by the director. The director and the supervisor shall have the authority to redefine the districts as needed to ensure the efficient administration of this chapter. The director and the supervisor shall solicit public input before revising the districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 52.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3101.

The supervisor shall appoint one chief deputy and at least one district deputy for each of the districts provided for in this chapter, and shall prescribe their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 898.)
-------------------------------------------

3103.

The chief deputy shall be a competent engineer or geologist, preferably licensed in the state, and experienced in the development and production of oil and gas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 53.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3104.

Each district deputy shall be a competent engineer or geologist, preferably licensed in the state, and experienced in the development and production of oil and gas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 54.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3105.

An office under the supervision of a district deputy may be maintained in each district. The office shall be conveniently accessible to the oil and gas operators in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3106.

(a) The supervisor shall so supervise the drilling, operation, maintenance, and abandonment of wells and the operation, maintenance, and removal or abandonment of tanks and facilities attendant to oil and gas production, including pipelines not subject to regulation pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 51010) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code that are within an oil and gas field, so as to prevent, as far as possible, damage to life, health, property, and natural resources; damage to underground oil and gas deposits from infiltrating water and other causes; loss of oil, gas, or reservoir energy, and damage to underground and surface waters suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes by the infiltration of, or the addition of, detrimental substances.

(b) The supervisor shall also supervise the drilling, operation, maintenance, and abandonment of wells so as to permit the owners or operators of the wells to utilize all methods and practices known to the oil industry for the purpose of increasing the ultimate recovery of underground hydrocarbons and which, in the opinion of the supervisor, are suitable for this purpose in each proposed case. To further the elimination of waste by increasing the recovery of underground hydrocarbons, it is hereby declared as a policy of this state that the grant in an oil and gas lease or contract to a lessee or operator of the right or power, in substance, to explore for and remove all hydrocarbons from any lands in the state, in the absence of an express provision to the contrary contained in the lease or contract, is deemed to allow the lessee or contractor, or the lessee’s or contractor’s successors or assigns, to do what a prudent operator using reasonable diligence would do, having in mind the best interests of the lessor, lessee, and the state in producing and removing hydrocarbons, including, but not limited to, the injection of air, gas, water, or other fluids into the productive strata, the application of pressure heat or other means for the reduction of viscosity of the hydrocarbons, the supplying of additional motive force, or the creating of enlarged or new channels for the underground movement of hydrocarbons into production wells, when these methods or processes employed have been approved by the supervisor, except that nothing contained in this section imposes a legal duty upon the lessee or contractor, or the lessee’s or contractor’s successors or assigns, to conduct these operations.

(c) The supervisor may require an operator to implement a monitoring program, designed to detect releases to the soil and water, including both groundwater and surface water, for aboveground oil production tanks and facilities.

(d) To best meet oil and gas needs in this state, the supervisor shall administer this division so as to encourage the wise development of oil and gas resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 523, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3106.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and notwithstanding any notice of intention, supplemental notice, well stimulation treatment permit, or similar authorization issued by the supervisor or district deputy, a local entity may, by ordinance, prohibit oil and gas operations or development in its jurisdiction or impose regulations, limits, or prohibitions on oil and gas operations or development that are more protective of public health, the climate, or the environment than those prescribed by a state law, regulation, or order. These limitations or prohibitions may include, but are not limited to, limitations or prohibitions related
 to the methods of oil and gas operations or development and the locations of oil and gas operations or development.
